ru: Основа подбора размера шейного ортеза: Размер аксессуара (XS–XL); Окружность воротника/шеи; Единый размер (регулируемая посадка); Рост райдера; Окружность туловища/груди; Другое
pt-PT: colar cervical tamanho base: Tamanho do acessório (XS–XL); Circunferência do colarinho/pescoço; Tamanho único (ajuste regulável); Altura do utilizador; Circunferência do tronco/peito; Outro
sl-SI: Osnova za velikost vratne opornice: Velikost dodatka (XS–XL); Obseg ovratnika/vratu; Enotna velikost (prilagodljivo prileganje); Višina voznika; Obseg trupa/prsi; Drugo
lt-LT: Kaklo įtvaro dydžio nustatymo pagrindas: Priedo dydis (XS–XL); Apykaklės / kaklo apimtis; Vienas dydis (reguliuojamas); Vairuotojo ūgis; Liemens / krūtinės apimtis; Kita
tr: Boyunluk beden belirleme ölçütü: Aksesuar boyutu (XS-XL); Yaka/boyun çevresi; Tek beden (ayarlanabilir kalıp); Sürücü boyu; Gövde/göğüs çevresi; Diğer
ro-RO: Baza dimensiunilor ortezei cervicale: Dimensiune accesoriu (XS-XL); Circumferința gulerului/gâtului; Mărime universală (potrivire ajustabilă); Înălțimea utilizatorului; Circumferința trunchiului/pieptului; Altele
vi: Kích thước nẹp cổ dựa trên tiêu chuẩn: Kích cỡ phụ kiện (XS–XL); Chu vi cổ áo/cổ; Một cỡ (vừa vặn có thể điều chỉnh); Chiều cao người lái; Chu vi thân mình/ngực; Khác
en: Neck brace size basis: Accessory size (XS–XL); Collar/neck circumference; One size (adjustable fit); Rider height; Torso/chest circumference; Other
es: Criterio de tamaño de la protección cervical: Tamaño del accesorio (XS–XL); Circunferencia del cuello; Talla única (ajustable); Estatura del usuario; Circunferencia del torso o pecho; Otro
de: Grundlage der Größenbestimmung der Nackenstütze: Größe des Zubehörs (XS–XL); Kragenweite/Halsumfang; Einheitsgröße (anpassbare Passform); Körpergröße; Rumpf-/Brustumfang; Sonstiges
sv: Grund för storleksval av nackstöd: Storlek på tillbehör (XS–XL); Krag-/halsomkrets; One size (justerbar passform); Förarens längd; Bål-/bröstomkrets; Övrigt
el: Βάση μεγέθους νάρθηκα λαιμού: Μέγεθος αξεσουάρ (XS–XL); Περίμετρος κολάρου/λαιμού; Ένα μέγεθος (ρυθμιζόμενη εφαρμογή); Ύψος αναβάτη; Περίμετρος κορμού/στήθους; Άλλο
nl: Nekbrace maatbasis: Accessoiregrootte (XS-XL); Kraag-/nekomtrek; Eén maat (verstelbare pasvorm); Lengte van de rijder; Romp-/borstomtrek; Anders
sk-SK: Základ pre výber veľkosti krčnej ortézy: Veľkosť doplnku (XS–XL); Obvod goliera/krku; Univerzálna veľkosť (nastaviteľný strih); Výška jazdca; Obvod trupu/hrudníka; Iné
cs: Velikostní reference krčních ortéz: Velikost příslušenství (XS–XL); Obvod límce / krku; Jedna velikost (nastavitelný střih); Výška jezdce; Obvod trupu / hrudníku; Ostatní
hu: Nyakmerevítő méretének alapja: Kiegészítő mérete (XS–XL); Nyakbőség/nyakkerület; Egyméretes (állítható); Használó magassága; Törzs/mellkas kerülete; Egyéb
da: Størrelsesgrundlag for nakkestøtte: Tilbehørsstørrelse (XS-XL); Krave-/halsomkreds; One-size (justerbar pasform); Rytterhøjde; Torso-/brystomkreds; Andet
zh-CN: 颈托尺码基准: 配件尺寸 (XS-XL); 领围/颈围; 均码（可调节贴合度）; 骑手身高; 躯干/胸围; 其他
bg-BG: Критерий за размер на шийната ортеза: Размер на аксесоара (XS–XL); Обиколка на яката/врата; Универсален размер (регулируем); Височина на ездача; Обиколка на торса/гърдите; Друго
nb: Størrelsesbasis for nakkestøtte: Størrelse på tilbehør (XS–XL); Krage-/nakkeomkrets; Én størrelse (justerbar passform); Førerhøyde; Torso-/brystomkrets; Annet
hr-HR: Osnovna veličina ortoze za vrat: Veličina dodatka (XS – XL); Opseg ovratnika / vrata; Univerzalna veličina (prilagodljivo); Visina vozača; Opseg torza / prsa; Ostalo
fi: Niskatuen koon mittaustapa: Tarvikekoko (XS–XL); Kauluksen/kaulan ympärysmitta; Yksi koko (säädettävä istuvuus); Ajajan pituus; Vartalon/rinnan ympärysmitta; Muu
th: ขนาดของปลอกคอพยุงคอเป็นเกณฑ์ในการเลือก: ขนาดของอุปกรณ์เสริม(XS–XL); เส้นรอบวงปลอกคอ/คอ; ขนาดเดียว(ปรับความกระชับได้); ส่วนสูงผู้ขับขี่; เส้นรอบวงลำตัว/หน้าอก; อื่นๆ
pl: Podstawa doboru rozmiaru kołnierza ochronnego: Wielkość akcesorium (XS–XL); Obwód kołnierza/szyi; Jeden rozmiar (regulowany); Wzrost użytkownika; Obwód tułowia/klatki piersiowej; Inne
zh-TW: 頸部護具尺寸依據: 配件尺寸 (XS–XL); 衣領/脖圍; 單一尺寸 (可調式貼合); 騎士身高; 軀幹/胸圍; 其他
fr: Critère de taille de la minerve de protection: Taille de l’accessoire (XS–XL); Tour de col/cou; Taille unique (ajustable); Taille du cycliste; Tour de torse/poitrine; Autre
ko: 목 보호대 크기 기준: 액세서리 크기(XS–XL); 칼라/목둘레; 원사이즈(조절 가능 핏); 탑승자 키; 몸통/가슴둘레; 기타
pt-BR: Protetor cervical base de tamanho: Tamanho do acessório (PP-GG); Circunferência do colarinho/pescoço; Tamanho único (ajustável); Altura do ciclista/motociclista; Circunferência do torso/peito; Outro
ja: ネックブレースのサイズ基準: アクセサリーのサイズ (XS〜XL); 首回り; ワンサイズ (調整可能なフィット感); ライダーの身長; 胴回り/胸囲; その他
it: Criterio di taglia del collare protettivo: Dimensioni dell'accessorio (XS-XL); Circonferenza del colletto/collo; Taglia unica (vestibilità regolabile); Altezza del pilota; Circonferenza del busto/torace; Altro